Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 9 Children

11-9-1.
Exploitation for commercial or immoral purposes.

Every person having the custody or control of any child under the age of sixteen (16) years who shall exhibit, use, or employ, or shall in any manner or under pretense sell, give away, let out or otherwise dispose of any child under the age of sixteen (16) years to any person for or in the vocation, occupation, service, or purpose of rope or wire walking, or as a gymnast, wrestler, contortionist, equestrian performer, acrobat, or rider upon any bicycle or mechanical contrivance, or in any dancing, theatrical, or musical exhibition unless it is in connection with churches, school or private instruction in dancing or music, or unless it is under the auspices of a Rhode Island society incorporated, or organized without incorporation for a purpose authorized by §

7-6-4

; or for or in gathering or picking rags, or collecting cigar stumps, bones or refuse from markets, or in begging, or in any mendicant or wandering occupation, or in peddling in places injurious to the morals of the child; or for or in the exhibition of any child with a disability, or in any illegal, obscene, indecent, or immoral purpose, exhibition, or vocation, injurious to the health or morals or dangerous to the life or limb of the child, or who shall cause, procure or encourage any child under the age of sixteen (16) years to engage in that activity, or who, after being notified by an officer mentioned in §

11-9-3

to restrain the child from engaging in that activity, shall neglect or refuse to do so, shall be held guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, for every such offense, be imprisoned not exceeding one year, or be fined not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250), or both, and shall forfeit any right which he or she may have to the custody of the child; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any child, not a resident of this state, who is engaged in any dancing, theatrical, or musical performance in this state and is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or tutor, when a permit for the appearance of the child is granted by the mayor of the city or the president of the town council of the town, where the performance is to be given; provided, further, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any child, a resident of this state, who is engaged in any dancing, theatrical, or musical performance in this state on a day when the public schools are not in session in the town or city where the dancing, theatrical or musical performance shall be given (not however on Sunday) if the child is accompanied by a parent, guardian or tutor, when a permit for the appearance of the child is granted by the mayor of the city or the president of the town council of the town where the performance is to be given.

Any person who shall in any manner or under any pretense sell, distribute, let out or otherwise permit any child under eighteen (18) years of age to be used in any book, magazine, pamphlet, or other publication, or in any motion picture film, photograph or pictorial representation, in a setting which taken as a whole suggests to the average person that the child has engaged in, or is about to engage in any sexual act, which shall include, but not be limited to, sodomy, oral copulation, sexual intercourse, masturbation, or bestiality, shall, upon conviction for the first offense be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both; upon conviction of a subsequent offense, be punished by imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years, a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both.

Every person who shall exhibit, use, employ or shall in any manner or under pretense so exhibit, use, or employ any child under the age of eighteen (18) years to any person for the purpose of prostitution or for any other lewd or indecent act shall be imprisoned not exceeding twenty (20) years, or be fined not exceeding twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 115, § 4; P.L. 1897, ch. 475, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 139, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 142, § 4; P.L. 1926, ch. 845, § 1; P.L. 1931, ch. 1756, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 425, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-1

; P.L. 1977, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 12; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 12.

11-9-1.1.
Child nudity prohibited in publications.

Every person, firm, association, or corporation which shall publish, sell, offer for sale, loan, give away, or otherwise distribute any book, magazine, pamphlet, or other publication, or any photograph, picture, or film which depicts any child, or children, under the age of eighteen (18) years and known to be under the age of eighteen (18) years of age by the person, firm, association, or corporation in a setting which taken as a whole suggests to the average person that the child, or children, is about to engage in or has engaged in, any sexual act, or which depicts any child under eighteen (18) years of age performing sodomy, oral copulation, sexual intercourse, masturbation, or bestiality, shall, for the first offense, be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both; for any subsequent offense, by imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years, or by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both. Provided, that artistic drawings, sketches, paintings, sculptures, or other artistic renditions, shall be exempt from the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 131, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 210, § 1.

11-9-1.2.
Rebuttable presumption of minority upon testimony of physician.

Whenever any person, firm, association or corporation is charged with a violation of the provisions of this chapter, testimony by a physician, duly authorized pursuant to the provisions of §

5-37-2

, that based upon the physician’s examination of the book, magazine, pamphlet, or other publication, or photograph, picture, or film which allegedly depicts any child or children under the age of eighteen (18) years, the physician is of the opinion, based upon a reasonable medical certainty, that any person depicted in it is under the age of eighteen (18) years, then there shall be created a rebuttable presumption of that fact.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 210, § 2.

11-9-1.3.
Child pornography prohibited.

Violations. It is a violation of this section for any person to:

Knowingly produce any child pornography;

Knowingly mail, transport, deliver or transfer by any means, including by computer, any child pornography;

Knowingly reproduce any child pornography by any means, including the computer; or

Knowingly possess any book, magazine, periodical, film, videotape, computer disk, computer file or any other material that contains an image of child pornography.

Penalties.

Whoever violates or attempts or conspires to violate subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(2) or (a)(3) of this section shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned for not more than fifteen (15) years, or both.

Whoever violates or attempts or conspires to violate subdivision (a)(4) of this section shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or both.

Definitions. For purposes of this section:

“Child pornography” means any visual depiction, including any photograph, film, video, picture, or computer or computer-generated image or picture, whether made or produced by electronic, mechanical, or other means, of sexually explicit conduct where:

The production of such visual depiction involves the use of a minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct;

Such visual depiction is a digital image, computer image, or computer-generated image of a minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct; or

Such visual depiction has been created, adapted, or modified to display an identifiable minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct.

“Computer” has the meaning given to that term in section

11-52-1

;

“Minor” means any person not having reached eighteen (18) years of age;

“Identifiable minor.”

Means a person:

(I) Who was a minor at the time the visual depiction was created, adapted, or modified; or

(II)

Whose image as a minor was used in creating, adapting, or modifying the visual depiction; and

Who is recognizable as an actual person by the person’s face, likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature; and

(B)

Shall not be construed to require proof of the actual identity of the identifiable minor.

“Producing” means producing, directing, manufacturing, issuing, publishing or advertising;

“Sexually explicit conduct” means actual:

Graphic sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, or lascivious sexual intercourse where the genitals, or pubic area of any person is exhibited;

Bestiality;

Masturbation;

Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or

Graphic or lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person;

“Visual depiction” includes undeveloped film and videotape and data stored on a computer disk or by electronic means, which is capable of conversion into a visual image;

“Graphic,” when used with respect to a depiction of sexually explicit conduct, means that a viewer can observe any part of the genitals or pubic area of any depicted person or animal during any part of the time that the sexually explicit conduct is being depicted.

Affirmative defenses.

It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of violating subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), or (a)(3) of this section that:

The alleged child pornography was produced using an actual person or persons engaging in sexually explicit conduct; and

Each such person was an adult at the time the material was produced; and

The defendant did not advertise, promote, present, describe or distribute the material in such a manner as to convey the impression that it is or contains a visual depiction of a minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct.

It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of violating subdivision (a)(4) of this section that the defendant:

Possessed less than three (3) images of child pornography; and

Promptly and in good faith and without retaining or allowing any person, other than a law enforcement agency, to access any image or copy of it:

Took reasonable steps to destroy each such image; or

Reported the matter to a law enforcement agency and afforded that agency access to each such image.

Severability. If any provision or provisions of this section, or the application of this section to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent authority, that invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without that invalid provision or provisions or application of the provision or provisions, and to this end the provisions of this section are declared to be separable and severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 586, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 612, § 2.

11-9-1.4.
Minor electronically disseminating indecent material to another person — “Sexting” prohibited.

Definitions as used in this section:

“Minor” means any person not having reached eighteen (18) years of age;

“Computer” has the meaning given to that term in §

11-52-1

;

“Telecommunication device” means an analog or digital electronic device which processes data, telephony, video, or sound transmission as part of any system involved in the sending and/or receiving at a distance of voice, sound, data, and/or video transmissions;

“Indecent visual depiction” means any digital image or digital video of the minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct, and includes data stored on any computer, telecommunication device, or other electronic storage media which is capable of conversion into a visual image;

“Sexually explicit conduct” means actual masturbation or graphic focus on or lascivious exhibition of the nude genitals or pubic area of the minor.

No minor shall knowingly and voluntarily and without threat or coercion use a computer or telecommunication device to transmit an indecent visual depiction of himself or herself to another person.

A violation of this section shall be a status offense and referred to the family court.

Any minor adjudicated under subsection (b) shall not be charged under §

11-9-1.3

and, further, shall not be subject to sex offender registration requirements set forth in §

11-37.1-1

et seq., entitled “Sexual Offender Registration and Community Notification Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 1.

11-9-1.5.
Electronically disseminating indecent material to minors prohibited.

Definitions as used in this section:

“Minor” means any person not having reached eighteen (18) years of age.

“Computer” has the meaning given to that term in §

11-52-1

.

“Telecommunication device” means an analog or digital electronic device that processes data, telephone, video, or sound transmission as part of any system involved in the sending and/or receiving at a distance of voice, sound, data, and/or video transmissions.

“Indecent visual depiction” means any digital image or digital video depicting one or more persons engaging in sexually explicit conduct, is obscene as defined in §

11-31-1(b)

, and includes:

Data stored on any computer, telecommunication device, or other electronic storage media that is capable of conversion into a visual image; or

Digital video depicting sexually explicit conduct transmitted live over a computer online service, internet service, or local electronic bulletin board service. If a digital image or digital video is part of a larger work, that larger work shall be the subject for the purpose of §

11-31-1(b)

analysis.

“Sexually explicit conduct” means actual:

Graphic sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, or lascivious sexual intercourse where the genitals or pubic area of any person is exhibited;

Bestiality;

Masturbation;

Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or

Graphic or lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person.

No person shall knowingly and intentionally use a computer or telecommunication device to transmit an indecent visual depiction to a person he or she knows is, or believes to be, a minor.

No minor shall be charged under this section if his or her conduct falls within §

11-9-1.4

, “Minor Electronically Disseminating Indecent Material to Another Person — ‘Sexting’ Prohibited.”

No person shall be charged under this section if the minor to whom the indecent visual depiction was transmitted was fifteen (15) years of age or older and the person transmitting the indecent visual depiction was not more than four (4) years older than the minor.

The fact that an undercover operative or law enforcement officer was involved in the detection and investigation of an offense under this section shall not constitute a defense to a prosecution under this section.

Those in violation of this section shall be guilty of a felony and subject to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Those in violation of this section shall be subject to sex offender registration requirements set forth in §

11-37.1-1

et seq., entitled “Sexual Offender Registration and Community Notification Act.”

Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability upon the following entities as a result of content or information provided by another person:

An interactive computer service;

A provider of public or private mobile service; or

A telecommunications network provider.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 416, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 448, § 2.

11-9-1.6.
Child erotica prohibited.

Definitions as used in this section:

“Minor” means any person not having reached eighteen (18) years of age.

“Produces” means produces, directs, manufactures, issues, publishes, or advertises.

“Visual portrayal” means any visual depiction as defined in §

11-9-1.3

, including, but not limited to, any photograph, film, video, picture, or computer-generated image or picture whether made or produced by electronic, mechanical, or other means.

Any person age eighteen (18) or over who knowingly and voluntarily, without threat or coercion, produces, possesses, displays, or distributes, in any form, any visual portrayals of minors who are partially clothed, where the visual portrayals are used for the specific purpose of sexual gratification or sexual arousal from viewing the visual portrayals, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be confined in jail for not more than one year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

Affirmative defenses.

It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of violating this section that:

The alleged child erotica was produced using an actual person or persons who was an adult at the time the material was produced;

The defendant promptly and in good faith and without retaining or allowing any person, other than a law enforcement agency, to access any visual portrayal or copy of it:

Took reasonable steps to destroy each such visual portrayal; or

Reported the matter to a law enforcement agency and afforded that agency access to each such image.

That the possessor, displayer, or distributor of child erotica is the parent or legal guardian of the child depicted in the visual portrayals and there is no competent evidence to prove an intent to use the visual portrayals for sexual gratification or sexual arousal from viewing the visual portrayals.

Severability. If any provision or provisions of this section, or the application of this section to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent authority, that invalidity does not affect the other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without that invalid provision or provisions or application of the provision or provisions, and to this end the provisions of this section are declared to be separable and severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 354, § 1, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 355, § 1, effective July 12, 2021.

11-9-2.
Employment of children for unlawful purposes.

Every person who shall take, receive, hire, employ, exhibit, or have in custody, or who shall cause to be taken, hired, employed, exhibited, or held in custody, any child under the age of sixteen (16) years, for any of the purposes prohibited in §

11-9-1

, shall be held guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished for every such offense in the manner provided in that section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 15, § 5; P.L. 1897, ch. 475, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 139, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 142, § 5; P.L. 1926, ch. 844, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 425, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-2

.

11-9-3.
Seizure and custody of exploited child — Proceedings as against neglected child.

The town sergeant of any town, the chief of police of any city, or any agent of the director of children, youth and families may enter any place where any child may be held, detained or employed in violation of §§

11-9-1

—

11-9-8

, and, without process of law, seize and detain the child and hold him or her as a witness to testify upon the trial of any person charged with violating the provisions of §§

11-9-1

—

11-9-8

; and if prior to or upon conviction of the offender, no person shall appear who is entitled to the custody of the child, the officer having the child in custody may bring proceedings against the child as a neglected child under the provisions of chapter 1 of title 14.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 115, § 6; P.L. 1897, ch. 475, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 139, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 142, § 6; P.L. 1926, ch. 844, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 425, § 3; P.L. 1950, ch. 2416, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-3

; P.L. 1969, ch. 242, § 1.

11-9-4.
Contributing to delinquency.

Every person who knowingly or willfully encourages, aids, contributes to, or in any way causes any child under the age of sixteen (16) years to violate any law of this state, or the ordinances of any town or city in this state, or who knowingly or willfully encourages, aids, contributes to, or in any way causes any child under the age of sixteen (16) years to be guilty of any vicious or immoral conduct, or who, being the parent, parents, legal guardian, or person having the custody or the control of any such child, permits or suffers the child to habitually associate with vicious, immoral, or criminal persons, or to grow up in ignorance, idleness, or crime, or to wander about the streets of any city or town in the nighttime without being in any lawful business or occupation, or to enter any house of ill fame, policy shop, or place where any gambling is carried on or gaming device is operated, or to enter any place where intoxicating liquors are sold, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1544, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 139, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 142, § 9; P.L. 1926, ch. 844, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 425, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-4

.

11-9-5.
Cruelty to or neglect of child.

Every person having the custody or control of any child under the age of eighteen (18) years who shall abandon that child, or who shall treat the child with gross or habitual cruelty, or who shall wrongfully cause or permit that child to be an habitual sufferer for want of food, clothing, proper care, or oversight, or who shall use or permit the use of that child for any wanton, cruel, or improper purpose, or who shall compel, cause, or permit that child to do any wanton or wrongful act, or who shall cause or permit the home of that child to be the resort of lewd, drunken, wanton, or dissolute persons, or who by reason of neglect, cruelty, drunkenness, or depravity, shall render the home of that child a place in which it is unfit for that child to live, or who shall neglect or refuse to pay the reasonable charges for the support of that child, whenever the child shall be placed by him or her in the custody of, or be assigned by any court to, any individual, association, or corporation, shall be guilty of a felony and shall for every such offense be imprisoned for not less than one year nor more than three (3) years, or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both, and the child may be proceeded against as a neglected child under the provisions of chapter 1 of title 14.

In addition to any penalty provided in this section, any person convicted or placed on probation for this offense may be required to receive psychosociological counseling in child growth, care and development as a part of that sentence or probation. For purposes of this section, and in accordance with §

40-11-15

, a parent or guardian practicing his or her religious beliefs which differ from general community standards who does not provide specified medical treatment for a child shall not, for that reason alone, be considered an abusive or negligent parent or guardian; provided, the provisions of this section shall not: (1) exempt a parent or guardian from having committed the offense of cruelty or neglect if the child is harmed under the provisions of (a) above; (2) exempt the department from the provisions of §

40-11-5

; or (3) prohibit the department from filing a petition, pursuant to the provisions of §

40-11-15

, for medical services for a child, where his or her health requires it.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 139, § 10; P.L. 1910, ch. 550, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2214, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 142, § 10; P.L. 1926, ch. 844, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 425, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-5

; P.L. 1977, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 599, § 2.

11-9-5.1.
Investigation upon report of cruelty or neglect.

In order to protect a child from cruelty or neglect, where any person has reasonable cause to believe that any child is being neglected or cruelly treated as defined in §

14-1-3

and reports such incident to the department of children, youth, and families, the department must cause an immediate investigation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 199, § 1.

11-9-5.2.
Immunity from liability.

Any person participating in good faith in the making of a report pursuant to this chapter shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any such participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 199, § 1.

11-9-5.3.
Child abuse — Brendan’s Law.

This section shall be known and may be referred to as “Brendan’s Law.”

Whenever a person having care of a child, as defined by §

40-11-2(2)

, whether assumed voluntarily or because of a legal obligation, including any instance where a child has been placed by his or her parents, caretaker, or licensed or governmental child placement agency for care or treatment, knowingly or intentionally:

Inflicts upon a child serious bodily injury, shall be guilty of first degree child abuse.

Inflicts upon a child any other physical injury, shall be guilty of second degree child abuse.

For the purposes of this section, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that:

Creates a substantial risk of death;

Causes protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily parts, member or organ, including any fractures of any bones;

Causes serious disfigurement; or

Evidences subdural hematoma, intercranial hemorrhage and/or retinal hemorrhages as signs of “shaken baby syndrome” and/or “abusive head trauma.”

For the purpose of this section, “other physical injury” is defined as any injury, other than a serious bodily injury, which arises other than from the imposition of nonexcessive corporal punishment.

Any person who commits first degree child abuse shall be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years, nor less than ten (10) years and fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Any person who is convicted of second degree child abuse shall be imprisoned for not more than ten (10) years, nor less than five (5) years and fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Any person who commits first degree child abuse on a child age five (5) or under shall not on the first ten (10) years of his or her sentence be afforded the benefit of suspension or deferment of sentence nor of probation for penalties provided in this section; and provided further, that the court shall order the defendant to serve a minimum of eight and one-half (81/2) years or more of the sentence before he or she becomes eligible for parole.

Any person who has been previously convicted of first or second degree child abuse under this section and thereafter commits first degree child abuse shall be imprisoned for not more than forty (40) years, nor less than twenty (20) years and fined not more than twenty thousand ($20,000) dollars and shall be subject to subsection (f) of this section if applicable. Any person who has been previously convicted of first or second degree child abuse under this section and thereafter commits second degree child abuse shall be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years, nor less than ten (10) years and fined not more than ten thousand ($10,000) dollars.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 318, § 1.

11-9-5.4.
Child endangerment.

When used in this section, the following words and phrases are construed as follows:

“Child” means any person under eighteen (18) years of age.

“Serious bodily injury” shall have the same definition as contained in §

11-5-2(c)

.

“Sexual abuse” means any sexual contact or penetration prohibited by chapter 37 of this title.

A person is guilty of endangering the welfare of a child when being a parent, guardian, or any other person who has custody or control of a child, the person:

Wantonly or recklessly engages in conduct that creates a substantial risk of serious bodily injury to the child or sexual abuse of the child; or

Wantonly or recklessly fails to take reasonable steps to alleviate such risk to the child where there is a duty to act.

For purposes of this section, such wanton and reckless behavior occurs when a person is aware of and consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that their acts, or omissions where there is a duty to act, would result in a substantial risk of serious bodily injury to the child or sexual abuse of the child for whom they have custody or control. The risk must be of such nature and degree that disregard of the risk constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person would observe in the situation.

Any person who shall violate this section shall be guilty of a felony, and for the first offense, be imprisoned up to three (3) years or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

Any person who has been previously convicted of child endangerment under this section and thereafter commits child endangerment shall be imprisoned up to ten (10) years or be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 161, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 162, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

11-9-6.
Proceedings against parents of delinquent children unaffected.

No proceedings instituted under any of the provisions of §§

11-9-1

—

11-9-8

shall in any manner affect or be affected by any proceedings which may be instituted under any of the provisions of chapter 9 of title 15.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 139, § 11; P.L. 1910, ch. 550, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 142, § 11; P.L. 1926, ch. 844, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 425, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-6

.

11-9-7.
Children’s Friend and Service excused from costs.

Whenever any agent of the Children’s Friend and Service shall make complaint against any person for any of the offenses mentioned in §§

11-9-1

—

11-9-8

, the agent shall not be required to enter into any recognizance for costs. All costs and expenses attending the making of any complaint by any agent of the service and the proceedings on it under the provisions of §§

11-9-1

—

11-9-8

, or under the provisions of chapter 1 of title 14, shall be paid by the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 115, § 7; P.L. 1897, ch. 475, § 4; P.L. 1908, ch. 1540, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 139, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 142, § 7; P.L. 1926, ch. 844, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 425, § 4; P.L. 1950, ch. 2416, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-7

.

11-9-8.
Appropriations for prevention of cruelty to children.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it may deem necessary, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, to be expended by the department of children, youth and families for the purpose of preventing cruelty to children, and the department may, in its discretion, pay the sum to the Children’s Friend and Service for that purpose, and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum or so much of it as may be required upon receipt by the state controller of proper vouchers approved by the director of the department.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 115, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 139, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 142, § 8; P.L. 1923, ch. 431, § 2; P.L. 1926, ch. 844, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1374, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 425, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 80; P.L. 1950, ch. 2416, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-8

.

11-9-9.
Powers of family court.

Where in §§

11-9-1

—

11-9-8

any authority is vested in any court, the authority vested in the court or courts mentioned is transferred to the family court. The family court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over any and all complaints and offenses set forth in §§

11-9-2

,

11-9-4

,

11-9-8

,

11-9-12

,

11-9-1

4 [repealed], and

11-9-15

, and shall have the authority to impose sentence as set forth in chapter 1 of title 14. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, jurisdiction for violations of §§ 11-9-1,

11-9-1.1

,

11-9-1.2

,

11-9-1.3

,

11-9-1.5

,

11-9-5

, and

11-9-5

.3 shall be vested in the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-9

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 586, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 612, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 290, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 44, § 1.

11-9-10.
Abandonment of refrigerator in place accessible to children.

Whoever, having been the owner of any refrigerator, icebox, chest, or other similar article, abandons that refrigerator, icebox, chest, or other similar article in any place accessible to children if the abandoned unit has an attached lid or door which cannot be opened easily from the inside, and who fails to remove the door or doors from it before abandoning the unit, unless the unit may be easily opened from the inside, shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3523, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-10

.

11-9-11.
Designation of curfew streets.

The police commissioners of any city or town having a police commission, and the chief of police of any other city or town, may designate certain streets in the city or town as curfew streets. No minor under sixteen (16) years of age shall be allowed to loiter on any curfew street after 9 o’clock (9:00) p.m., unless accompanied by some adult person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1911, ch. 718, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 43; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-11

.

11-9-12.
Penalty for loitering on curfew street.

Any minor under sixteen (16) years of age, not accompanied by an adult person, who shall loiter on any curfew street after being directed by any police constable to cease loitering, shall be fined not exceeding five dollars ($5.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1911, ch. 718, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 44; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 44; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-12

.

11-9-13.
Sale or delivery of tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products to individuals under twenty-one (21) — Posting notice of law.

No person shall sell, give, or deliver to any individual under twenty-one (21) years of age, any tobacco product in the form of cigarettes, bidi cigarettes, cigars, little cigars, flavored cigars known as “blunts,” unflavored “blunts,” flavored and unflavored blunt wraps, cigarette rolling papers of any size or composition, cigarillos and tiparillos, pipe tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, electronic nicotine-delivery system products, or any and all products as defined in §

44-20-1

. Any person, firm, or corporation that owns, manages, or operates a place of business in which tobacco products are sold, including sales through tobacco product vending machines, shall post notice of this law conspicuously in the place of business in letters at least three-eighths of an inch (3/8") high.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-13

; P.L. 1987, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.